Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-10,112
Excess fees; disposition.

If the department determines that any fee has been erroneously collected or computed, the department shall credit the excess amount collected or paid to any fees then due and owing from the person under the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Act. Any remaining balance may be refunded to the person by whom it was paid.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 41.